Utah statutes.
17-36-11.   Tentative budget -- Public record prior to adoption.

(1) (a)  On or before December 31, 2014, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is not subject to the provisions of this section; and

(b)  on or after January 1, 2015, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is subject to the provisions of this section.

(2)  The tentative budget and all supportive schedules and data shall be a public record available for inspection during business hours at the office of the budget officer for at least 10 days prior to the public hearing on the adoption of a final budget.

